North Dakota, session 69, HB1582.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. LEGISLATIVE MANAGEMENT STUDY - FALSE REPORTING. During the 2025-26
interim, the legislative management shall consider studying chapter 12.1-11 of the North Dakota
Century Code, relating to false accusations or false reports of a crime. The study must include input
from the state's attorney's association and defense attorneys. The legislative management shall report
its findings and recommendations, together with any legislation necessary to implement the
recommendations, to the seventieth legislative assembly.

H. B. NO. 1582 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1582.
House Vote: Yeas 84 Nays 7 Absent 3
Senate Vote: Yeas 46 Nays 0 Absent 1
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State